Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5230.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1e. "Animal-drawn vehicle" means any coach, carriage, or buggy drawn by an animal and on which an individual is or may be transported on a highway or street. Sec. 684. (1) (a) Every vehicle upon on a highway within or street in this state at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise and or at any other time when there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible persons and vehicles on the highway or street at a distance of 500 feet ahead shall must display lighted lamps and illuminating or illuminated devices as hereinafter respectively required under this chapter for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to except for parked vehicles as hereinafter stated. provided under this chapter. When lighted lamps and or illuminated devices are required by law no on a vehicle, a vehicle shall must not be operated upon any on a highway of or street in this state with only the parking lights illuminated on the front of the vehicle. (2) (b) Whenever requirement is hereinafter declared as to Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, the distance from which certain lighted lamps and or illuminated devices shall must render objects visible or within the distance from which such lighted lamps or illuminated devices shall must be visible , said provisions shall apply applies during the times stated in paragraph (a) of this section upon subsection (1) on a straight, level, unlighted highway or street under normal atmospheric conditions. unless a different time or condition is expressly stated. (3) (c) Whenever requirement is hereinafter declared as to Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, the mounted height of lighted lamps or illuminated devices , it shall mean must measure from the center of such the lighted lamp or illuminated device to the level ground upon which the vehicle stands when such the vehicle is without a load. Sec. 688a. (1) In addition to the requirements under section 688, when a vehicle is operated on a highway or street and the vehicle is an animal-drawn vehicle, the animal-drawn vehicle must be equipped with the following lighted lamps or illuminated devices: (a) At least 2 front lighted lamps or illuminated devices that emit a white light visible within 500 feet of the front and the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle. (b) At least 2 rear lighted lamps or illuminated devices that emit a red light visible within 500 feet of the front and the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle. (c) At least 2 warning lighted lamps or illuminated devices on the front and at least 2 warning lighted lamps or illuminated devices on the rear that emit amber flashing light visible within 500 feet of the front and the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle. (2) The lighted lamps or illuminated devices described under subsection (1) must be mounted no less than 2.5 feet or more than 12 feet above the ground, as symmetrically and as widely spaced as possible around the centerline of the animal-drawn vehicle. (3) In addition to the times specified in section 684(1), the lighted lamps or illuminated devices described in subsection (1) must be lighted or illuminated during all of the following conditions: (a) Low visibility due to weather conditions including, but not limited to, rain, snow, sleet, hail, or fog. (b) Visibility less than 1,000 feet to the front or the rear of the animal-drawn vehicle. (c) Insufficient light. (d) Heavy traffic. (e) Posted work zone. (4) A driver of an animal-drawn vehicle who fails to use lighted lamps or illuminated devices as required under this section is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $200.00. (5) This section does not apply to an animal-drawn vehicle operated on a highway or street situated on state park lands where the use of motor vehicles, except for the use of vehicles owned by this state, a political subdivision of this state, or a public utility, is not permitted. Sec. 695. All vehicles, including animal-drawn vehicles, implements Implements of husbandry , road machinery, road rollers, and farm tractors, not otherwise required under this act to be equipped with head or rear lamps , shall must at the times specified in section 684 be in compliance with either of the following: (a) For implements of husbandry If manufactured before January 1, 2007, be equipped with at least 1 lighted lamp exhibiting or illuminated device emitting a white light visible from a distance of within 500 feet to of the front of the vehicle implement of husbandry and with a lighted lamp exhibiting or illuminated device emitting a red light visible from a distance of within 500 feet to of the rear of the vehicle.implement of husbandry. (b) For implements of husbandry If manufactured on or after January 1, 2007, be in compliance with section 684a. Sec. 907. (1) A violation of this act, or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, that is designated a civil infraction must not be considered a lesser included offense of a criminal offense. (2) Permission may be granted for payment of a civil fine and costs to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments but, unless permission is included in the order or judgment, the civil fine and costs must be payable immediately. Except as otherwise provided, a person found responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction must pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and 1 or more of the following civil fines, as applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided, for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act, the person must be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. (b) If the civil infraction was a moving violation that resulted in an at-fault collision with another vehicle, an individual, or any other object, the civil fine ordered under this section is increased by $25.00 but the total civil fine must not be more than $100.00. (c) For a violation of section 240, the civil fine ordered under this section is $15.00. (d) For a violation of section 312a(4)(a), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $250.00. (e) For a first violation of section 319f(1), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $2,500.00 or more than $2,750.00; for a second or subsequent violation, the civil fine must not be less than $5,000.00 or more than $5,500.00. (f) For a violation of section 319g(1)(a), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10,000.00. (g) For a violation of section 319g(1)(g), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $2,750.00 or more than $25,000.00. (h) For a violation of section 602b, the civil fine ordered under this section must be as follows: (i) For a violation of section 602b(1), either of the following: (A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $100.00 for a first offense and $250.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (B) If the violation involves an accident, $200.00 for a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (ii) For a violation of section 602b(2), either of the following: (A) If the violation does not involve an accident, $200.00 for a first offense and $500.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (B) If the violation involves an accident, $400.00 for a first offense and $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense. (i) For a violation of section 627c, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $150.00 for a second violation as described in section 627c(2)(b) and $300.00 for a third or subsequent violation described in section 627c(2)(c). (j) For a violation of section 674(1)(s) or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 674(1)(s), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more than $250.00. (k) For a violation of section 676a(3), the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00. (l) For a violation of section 676c, the civil fine ordered under this section is $1,000.00. (m) For a violation of section 682 or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to section 682, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be less than $100.00 or more than $500.00. (n) For a violation of section 688a, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $200.00. (o) (n) For a violation of section 710d, the civil fine ordered under this section must not be more than $10.00, subject to subsection (11). (p) (o) For a violation of section 710e, the civil fine and court costs ordered under this subsection must be $25.00. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an individual is determined to be responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act while driving a commercial motor vehicle, the individual must be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine of not more than $250.00. (4) If a civil fine is ordered under subsection (2) or (3), the judge or district court magistrate shall summarily tax and determine the costs of the action, which are not limited to the costs taxable in ordinary civil actions, and may include all expenses, direct and indirect, to which the plaintiff has been put in connection with the civil infraction, up to the entry of judgment. Costs must not be ordered in excess of $100.00. A civil fine ordered under subsection (2) or (3) must not be waived unless costs ordered under this subsection are waived. Except as otherwise provided by law, costs are payable to the general fund of the plaintiff. (5) In addition to a civil fine and costs ordered under subsection (2) or (3) and subsection (4) and the justice system assessment ordered under subsection (12), the judge or district court magistrate may order the individual to attend and complete a program of treatment, education, or rehabilitation. (6) A district court magistrate shall impose the sanctions permitted under subsections (2), (3), and (5) only to the extent expressly authorized by the chief judge or only judge of the district court district. (7) Each district of the district court and each municipal court may establish a schedule of civil fines, costs, and assessments to be imposed for civil infractions that occur within the respective district or city. If a schedule is established, it must be prominently posted and readily available for public inspection. A schedule need not include all violations that are designated by law or ordinance as civil infractions. A schedule may exclude cases on the basis of a defendant's prior record of civil infractions or traffic offenses, or a combination of civil infractions and traffic offenses. (8) The state court administrator shall annually publish and distribute to each district and court a recommended range of civil fines and costs for first-time civil infractions. This recommendation is not binding on the courts that have jurisdiction over civil infractions but is intended to act as a normative guide for judges and district court magistrates and a basis for public evaluation of disparities in the imposition of civil fines and costs throughout this state. (9) If a person has received a civil infraction citation for defective safety equipment on a vehicle under section 683, the court shall waive a civil fine, costs, and assessments on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that repair of the defective equipment was made before the appearance date on the citation. (10) A default in the payment of a civil fine or costs ordered under subsection (2), (3), or (4) or a justice system assessment ordered under subsection (12), or an installment of the fine, costs, or assessment, may be collected by a means authorized for the enforcement of a judgment under chapter 40 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4001 to 600.4065, or under chapter 60 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.6001 to 600.6098. (11) Before the effective date of 2024 PA 22, the court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition, purchase, or rental of a child seating system meeting the requirements of section 710d. Beginning on the effective date of 2024 PA 22, the The court may waive any civil fine, cost, or assessment against an individual who received a civil infraction citation for a violation of section 710d if the individual, before the appearance date on the citation, supplies the court with evidence of acquisition of a child seating system that meets the requirements of section 710d and evidence that the individual has received education from a certified child passenger safety technician. (12) In addition to any civil fines or costs ordered to be paid under this section, the judge or district court magistrate shall order the defendant to pay a justice system assessment of $40.00 for each civil infraction determination, except for a parking violation or a violation for which the total fine and costs imposed are $10.00 or less. On payment of the assessment, the clerk of the court shall transmit the assessment collected to the state treasury to be deposited into the justice system fund created in section 181 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.181. An assessment levied under this subsection is not a civil fine for purposes of section 909. (13) If a person has received a citation for a violation of section 223, the court shall waive any civil fine, costs, and assessment on receipt of certification by a law enforcement agency that the person, before the appearance date on the citation, produced a valid registration certificate that was valid on the date the violation of section 223 occurred. (14) If a person has received a citation for a violation of section 328(1) for failing to produce a certificate of insurance under section 328(2), the court may waive the fee described in section 328(3)(c) and shall waive any fine, costs, and any other fee or assessment otherwise authorized under this act on receipt of verification by the court that the person, before the appearance date on the citation, produced valid proof of insurance that was in effect when the violation of section 328(1) occurred. Insurance obtained after the violation occurred does not make the person eligible for a waiver under this subsection. (15) If a person is determined to be responsible or responsible "with explanation" for a civil infraction under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to a provision of this act and the civil infraction arises out of the ownership or operation of a commercial quadricycle, the person must be ordered to pay costs as provided in subsection (4) and a civil fine of not more than $500.00. (16) As used in this section, "moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance that substantially corresponds to this act that involves the operation of a motor vehicle and for which a fine may be assessed.